tutorial-env/lib/python3.6/site-packages/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_ro_RO.dic
UTF-8
% Versiune:
%  3.3.6
%
% Authors:
%  Adrian Stoica (office@cuvinte.ro)
%  Lucian Constantin (http://rospell.sourceforge.net)
%
% License:
%  GNU General Public License Version 2 or later (see COPYING.GPL)
%
% Support:
%  Please direct all your questions on http://groups.google.com/group/rospell mailing list.
%
% excepții
%
% românească, românesc, românește
ro1m
3ne
nea1s
ne1a1
.alt1fe4l.
.a1
.a1l
.2a2l1t2
.al2t3f4
.a1ltf2e1l
.ast1fe4l.
.a1s
.a2s1t2
.as2t3f4
.astf2e1l
.de1altfe4l.
.1d
.de1a1
.de1a1l
.de2a2l1t2
.deal2t3f4
.dea1ltf2e1l
.a1no1fe4l.
.a2n
.a3no
.ano1f4
.anof2e1l
.a1no1fe1lă.
.anofel2ă1
1c
2c4i.
c2i1
3n2i1
4n4i.
4r4i.
r2i1
1ț
2ț4i.
ț2i1
1v
ve5n2i1
ve4n4i.
v2en
o1v
o1ve4n4i.
ove5n2i1
ov2en
a1
a3e
2ă1
ă3i1
e1a1
e3e
e1o1
2i1
i1e
2i2i1
i1o
i2u1
o3e
o3u1
2u1
u2i1
u1o
1l
2l1p2
l2p3t2
1m
2m1p2
m2p3t2
m2p3ț
2n1c
n2c2ș
n2c1t2
n2c1ț
2n1d
n2d1v
2r1c
r2c1t2
2r1t2
r2t3f4
1s
2s1t2
s2t3m
2r1s2
r3s1t2
r2s2t1n
a1b
a1c
a1d
a1f4
a1g2
a1h
a1j
a1k
a1l
a2m
a2n
a1p2
a1q
a1r
a1s
a2ș
a1t2
a1ț
a1v
a1w
a1x
a1z
ă1b
ă1c
ă1d
ă1f4
ă1g2
ă1h
ă1j
ă1k
ă1l
ă2m2
ă1n
ă1p2
ă1q
ă1r
ă1s
ă3ș
ă1t2
ă1ț
ă3v
ă1w
ă1x
ă1z
â1b
â1c
â1d
â1f4
â1g2
â1h
â1j
â1k
â1l
â1m
â1n
â1p2
â1q
â1r
â1s
â2ș
â1t2
â1ț
â1v
â1w
â1x
â1z
e1b
2e1c
e1d
e1f4
e1g2
e1h
e1j
e1k
2e1l
e2m
2en
e1p2
e1q
e1r
2e2s
2e2ș
e1t2
2e1ț
e1v
e1w
e2x
2e1z
i1b
i1c
i1d
i1f4
i1g2
i1h
i1j
i1k
i1l
i1m
i2n
i1p2
i1q
i1r
i2s
i2ș
i1t2
i1ț
i1v
i1w
i1x
i1z
î2
î1b
î1c
î3d
î1f4
î1g2
î1h
î1j
î1k
î1l
î1m
î1n
î1p2
î1q
î1r
î1s
î2ș
î3t2
î3ț
î1v
î1w
î1x
î3z
o1b
o1c
2o1d
o1f4
o1g2
o1h
o1j
o1k
o1l
o1m
2on
o1p2
o1q
o1r
o1s
o2ș
o1t2
o1ț
o1w
o1x
o1z
u1b
u1c
u1d
u1f4
u1g2
u1h
u1j
u1k
u2l
u1m
u1n
u1p2
u1q
u1r
u2s
u3ș
u1t2
u1ț
u1v
u1w
u1x
u1z
y1b
y1c
y1d
y1f4
y1g2
y1h
y1j
y1k
y1l
y1m
y1n
y1p2
y1q
y1r
y1s
y2ș
y1t2
y1ț
y1v
y1w
y1x
y1z
a2b1b
a2b1c
a2b1d
a2b1f4
a2b1g2
a2b1h
a2b1j
a2b1k
a2b1m
a2b1n
a2b1p2
a2b1q
a2b1s
a2b2ș
a2b1t2
a2b1ț
a2b1v
a2b1w
a2b1x
a2b1z
a2c1b
a2c1c
a2c1d
a2c1f4
a2c1g2
a2c1j
a2c1k
a2c1m
a2c5n
a2c1p2
a2c1q
a2c1s
a2c2ș
a2c1t2
a2c1ț
a2c1v
a2c1w
a2c1x
a2c1z
a2d1b
a2d1c
a2d1d
a2d1f4
a2d1g2
a2d1h
a2d1j
a2d1k
a2d1m
a2d1n
a2d1p2
a2d1q
a2d1s
a2d2ș
a2d1t2
a2d1ț
a2d1v
a2d1w
a2d1x
a2d1z
a2f1b
a2f1c
a2f1d
a2f4f4
a2f1g2
a2f1h
a2f1j
a2f1k
a2f1m
a2f1n
a2f1p2
a2f1q
a2f1s
a2f2ș
a2f1t2
a2f1ț
a2f1v
a2f1w
a2f1x
a2f1z
a2g1b
a2g1c
a2g1d
a2g1f4
a2g2g2
a2g1j
a2g1k
a2g3m
a2g3n
a2g1p2
a2g1q
a2g1s
a2g2ș
a2g1t2
a2g1ț
a2g3v
a2g1w
a2g1x
a2g1z
a2h1b
a2h1c
a2h1d
a2h1f4
a2h1g2
a2h1h
a2h1j
a2h1k
a2h1m
a2h1n
a2h1p2
a2h1q
a2h1s
a2h2ș
a2h1t2
a2h1ț
a2h1v
a2h1w
a2h1x
a2h1z
a2j1b
a2j1c
a2j1d
a2j1f4
a2j1g2
a2j1h
a2j1j
a2j1k
a2j1l
a2j1m
a2j1n
a2j1p2
a2j1q
a2j1r
a2j1s
a2j2ș
a2j1t2
a2j1ț
a2j1v
a2j1w
a2j1x
a2j1z
a2k1b
a2k1c
a2k1d
a2k1f4
a2k1g2
a2k1h
a2k1j
a2k1k
a2k1l
a2k1m
a2k1n
a2k1p2
a2k1q
a2k1r
a2k1s
a2k2ș
a2k1t2
a2k1ț
a2k1v
a2k1w
a2k1x
a2k1z
a2l1b
a2l1c
a2l1d
a2l1f4
a2l1g2
a2l1h
a2l1j
a2l1k
a2l1l
a2l1m
a2l5n
a2l1p2
a2l1q
a2l1r
a2l1s
a2l3ș
2a2l1t2
a2l1ț
a2l1v
a2l1w
a2l1x
a2l1z
a2m1b
a2m1c
a2m1d
a2m1f4
a2m1g2
a2m1h
a2m1j
a2m1k
a2m1l
a2m1m
a2m1n
a2m1p2
a2m1q
a2m1r
a2m3s2
a2m2ș
a2m1t2
a2m1ț
a2m1v
a2m1w
a2m1x
a2m1z
a2n1b
a2n1c
a2n1d
a2n1f4
a2n1g2
a2n1h
a2n3j
a2n1k
a2n1l
a2n1m
a2n1n
a2n1p2
a2n1q
a2n1r
a2n4s2
a2n3ș2
a2n1t2
a2n1ț
a2n1v
a2n1w
a2n1x
a2n2z
a2p1b
a2p3c
a2p1d
a2p1f4
a2p1g2
a2p1h
a2p1j
a2p1k
a2p1m
a2p1n
a2p2p2
a2p1q
a2p3s
a2p3ș
a2p3t2
a2p3ț
a2p1v
a2p1w
a2p1x
a2p1z
a2q1b
a2q1c
a2q1d
a2q1f4
a2q1g2
a2q1h
a2q1j
a2q1k
a2q1l
a2q1m
a2q1n
a2q1p2
a2q1q
a2q1r
a2q1s
a2q2ș
a2q1t2
a2q1ț
a2q1v
a2q1w
a2q1x
a2q1z
a2r1b
a2r1c
a2r1d
a2r1f4
a2r1g2
a2r1h
a2r1j
a2r1k
a2r1l
a2r1m
a2r1n
a2r1p2
a2r1q
a2r1r
a2r1s2
a2r3ș
a2r1t2
a2r1ț
a2r1v
a2r1w
a2r1x
a2r1z
a2s1b
a2s1c
a2s1d
a4s2f4
a2s1g2
a2s1h
a2s1j
a2s1k
a3s4l
a4s1m
a2s1n
a2s1p2
a2s1q
a2s1r
a2s1s
a2s2ș
a2s1t2
a2s1ț
a2s1v
a2s1w
a2s1x
a2s1z
a2ș1b
a2ș1c
a2ș1d
a2ș1f4
a2ș1g2
a2ș1h
a2ș1j
a2ș1k
a2ș1l
a2ș1m
a4ș5n
a2ș2p2
a2ș1q
a2ș1r
a2ș1s
a2ș2ș
a2ș1t2
a2ș1ț
a2ș1v
a2ș1w
a2ș1x
a2ș1z
a2t1b
a2t3c
a2t3d
a2t3f4
a2t1g2
a2t1h
a2t1j
a2t1k
a2t3m
a2t1n
a2t1p2
a2t1q
a4t3s2
a2t2ș
a2t3t2
a2t1ț
a2t1v
a2t1w
a2t1x
a4t3z
a2ț1b
a2ț1c
a2ț1d
a2ț1f4
a2ț1g2
a2ț1h
a2ț1j
a2ț1k
a2ț1l
a2ț1m
a2ț1n
a2ț1p2
a2ț1q
a2ț1r
a2ț1s
a2ț2ș
a2ț1t2
a2ț1ț
a2ț1v
a2ț1w
a2ț1x
a2ț1z
a2v1b
a2v1c
a2v1d
a2v1f4
a2v1g2
a2v1h
a2v1j
a2v1k
a2v1m
a2v1n
a2v1p2
a2v1q
a2v1s
a2v2ș
a2v1t2
a2v1ț
a2v1v
a2v1w
a2v1x
a2v1z
a2w1b
a2w1c
a2w1d
a2w1f4
a2w1g2
a2w1h
a2w1j
a2w1k
a2w1l
a2w1m
a2w1n
a2w1p2
a2w1q
a2w1r
a2w1s
a2w2ș
a2w1t2
a2w1ț
a2w1v
a2w1w
a2w1x
a2w1z
a2x1b
a2x1c
a2x1d
a2x1f4
a2x1g2
a2x1h
a2x1j
a2x1k
a2x1l
a2x1m
a2x1n
a2x1p2
a2x1q
a2x1r
a2x1s
a2x2ș
a2x1t2
a2x1ț
a2x1v
a2x1w
a2x1x
a2x1z
a2z1b
a2z1c
a2z1d
a2z1f4
a2z2g2
a2z1h
a2z1j
a2z1k
a2z1l
a2z4m
a2z1n
a2z1p2
a2z1q
a2z1r
a2z1s
a2z2ș
a2z1t2
a2z1ț
a2z2v
a2z1w
a2z1x
a2z1z
ă2b1b
ă2b1c
ă2b1d
ă2b1f4
ă2b1g2
ă2b1h
ă2b1j
ă2b1k
ă2b1m
ă2b1n
ă2b1p2
ă2b1q
ă2b1s
ă2b2ș
ă2b1t2
ă2b1ț
ă2b1v
ă2b1w
ă2b1x
ă2b1z
ă2c1b
ă2c1c
ă2c1d
ă2c1f4
ă2c1g2
ă2c1j
ă2c1k
ă2c1m
ă2c5n
ă2c1p2
ă2c1q
ă2c1s
ă2c2ș
ă2c1t2
ă2c1ț
ă2c1v
ă2c1w
ă2c1x
ă2c1z
ă2d1b
ă2d1c
ă2d1d
ă2d1f4
ă2d1g2
ă2d1h
ă2d1j
ă2d1k
ă2d1m
ă2d1n
ă2d1p2
ă2d1q
ă2d1s
ă2d2ș
ă2d1t2
ă2d1ț
ă2d1v
ă2d1w
ă2d1x
ă2d1z
ă2f1b
ă2f1c
ă2f1d
ă2f4f4
ă2f1g2
ă2f1h
ă2f1j
ă2f1k
ă2f1m
ă2f1n
ă2f1p2
ă2f1q
ă2f1s
ă2f2ș
ă2f1t2
ă2f1ț
ă2f1v
ă2f1w
ă2f1x
ă2f1z
ă2g1b
ă2g1c
ă2g1d
ă2g1f4
ă2g2g2
ă2g1j
ă2g1k
ă2g3m
ă2g3n
ă2g1p2
ă2g1q
ă2g1s
ă2g2ș
ă2g1t2
ă2g1ț
ă2g3v
ă2g1w
ă2g1x
ă2g1z
ă2h1b
ă2h1c
ă2h1d
ă2h1f4
ă2h1g2
ă2h1h
ă2h1j
ă2h1k
ă2h1m
ă2h1n
ă2h1p2
ă2h1q
ă2h1s
ă2h2ș
ă2h1t2
ă2h1ț
ă2h1v
ă2h1w
ă2h1x
ă2h1z
ă2j1b
ă2j1c
ă2j1d
ă2j1f4
ă2j1g2
ă2j1h
ă2j1j
ă2j1k
ă2j1l
ă2j1m
ă2j1n
ă2j1p2
ă2j1q
ă2j1r
ă2j1s
ă2j2ș
ă2j1t2
ă2j1ț
ă2j1v
ă2j1w
ă2j1x
ă2j1z
ă2k1b
ă2k1c
ă2k1d
ă2k1f4
ă2k1g2
ă2k1h
ă2k1j
ă2k1k
ă2k1l
ă2k1m
ă2k1n
ă2k1p2
ă2k1q
ă2k1r
ă2k1s
ă2k2ș
ă2k1t2
ă2k1ț
ă2k1v
ă2k1w
ă2k1x
ă2k1z
ă2l1b
ă2l1c
ă2l1d
ă2l1f4
ă2l1g2
ă2l1h
ă2l1j
ă2l1k
ă2l1l
ă2l1m
ă2l5n
ă2l1p2
ă2l1q
ă2l1r
ă2l1s
ă2l3ș
ă2l1t2
ă2l1ț
ă2l1v
ă2l1w
ă2l1x
ă2l1z
ă2m1b
ă2m1c
ă2m1d
ă2m1f4
ă2m1g2
ă2m1h
ă2m1j
ă2m1k
ă2m1l
ă2m1m
ă2m1n
ă2m1p2
ă2m1q
ă2m1r
ă2m3s2
ă2m2ș
ă2m1t2
ă2m1ț
ă2m1v
ă2m1w
ă2m1x
ă2m1z
ă2n1b
ă2n1c
ă2n1d
ă2n1f4
ă2n1g2
ă2n1h
ă2n3j
ă2n1k
ă2n1l
ă2n1m
ă2n1n
ă2n1p2
ă2n1q
ă2n1r
ă2n3s2
ă2n3ș2
ă2n1t2
ă2n1ț
ă2n1v
ă2n1w
ă2n1x
ă2n1z
ă2p1b
ă2p3c
ă2p1d
ă2p1f4
ă2p1g2
ă2p1h
ă2p1j
ă2p1k
ă2p1m
ă2p1n
ă2p2p2
ă2p1q
ă2p3s
ă2p3ș
ă2p3t2
ă2p3ț
ă2p1v
ă2p1w
ă2p1x
ă2p1z
ă2q1b
ă2q1c
ă2q1d
ă2q1f4
ă2q1g2
ă2q1h
ă2q1j
ă2q1k
ă2q1l
ă2q1m
ă2q1n
ă2q1p2
ă2q1q
ă2q1r
ă2q1s
ă2q2ș
ă2q1t2
ă2q1ț
ă2q1v
ă2q1w
ă2q1x
ă2q1z
ă2r1b
ă2r1c
ă2r1d
ă2r1f4
ă2r1g2
ă2r1h
ă2r1j
ă2r1k
ă2r1l
ă2r1m
ă2r1n
ă2r1p2
ă2r1q
ă2r1r
ă2r1s2
ă2r3ș
ă2r1t2
ă2r1ț
ă2r1v
ă2r1w
ă2r1x
ă2r1z
ă2s1b
ă2s1c
ă2s1d
ă4s2f4
ă2s1g2
ă2s1h
ă2s1j
ă2s1k
ă3s4l
ă4s1m
ă2s1n
ă2s1p2
ă2s1q
ă2s1r
ă2s1s
ă2s2ș
ă2s1t2
ă2s1ț
ă2s1v
ă2s1w
ă2s1x
ă2s1z
ă2ș1b
ă2ș1c
ă2ș1d
ă2ș1f4
ă2ș1g2
ă2ș1h
ă2ș1j
ă2ș1k
ă2ș1l
ă2ș1m
ă4ș5n
ă2ș2p2
ă2ș1q
ă2ș1r
ă2ș1s
ă2ș2ș
ă4ș3t2
ă2ș1ț
ă2ș1v
ă2ș1w
ă2ș1x
ă2ș1z
ă2t1b
ă2t3c
ă2t3d
ă2t3f4
ă2t1g2
ă2t1h
ă2t1j
ă2t1k
ă2t3m
ă2t1n
ă2t1p2
ă2t1q
ă4t3s2
ă2t2ș
ă2t3t2
ă2t1ț
ă2t1v
ă2t1w
ă2t1x
ă4t3z
ă2ț1b
ă2ț1c
ă2ț1d
ă2ț1f4
ă2ț1g2
ă2ț1h
ă2ț1j
ă2ț1k
ă2ț1l
ă2ț1m
ă2ț1n
ă2ț1p2
ă2ț1q
ă2ț1r
ă2ț1s
ă2ț2ș
ă2ț1t2
ă2ț1ț
ă2ț1v
ă2ț1w
ă2ț1x
ă2ț1z
ă2v1b
ă2v1c
ă2v1d
ă2v1f4
ă2v1g2
ă2v1h
ă2v1j
ă2v1k
ă2v1m
ă2v1n
ă2v1p2
ă2v1q
ă2v1s
ă2v2ș
ă2v1t2
ă2v1ț
ă2v1v
ă2v1w
ă2v1x
ă2v1z
ă2w1b
ă2w1c
ă2w1d
ă2w1f4
ă2w1g2
ă2w1h
ă2w1j
ă2w1k
ă2w1l
ă2w1m
ă2w1n
ă2w1p2
ă2w1q
ă2w1r
ă2w1s
ă2w2ș
ă2w1t2
ă2w1ț
ă2w1v
ă2w1w
ă2w1x
ă2w1z
ă2x1b
ă2x1c
ă2x1d
ă2x1f4
ă2x1g2
ă2x1h
ă2x1j
ă2x1k
ă2x1l
ă2x1m
ă2x1n
ă2x1p2
ă2x1q
ă2x1r
ă2x1s
ă2x2ș
ă2x1t2
ă2x1ț
ă2x1v
ă2x1w
ă2x1x
ă2x1z
ă2z1b
ă2z1c
ă2z1d
ă2z1f4
ă2z2g2
ă2z1h
ă2z1j
ă2z1k
ă2z1l
ă2z4m
ă2z1n
ă2z1p2
ă2z1q
ă2z1r
ă2z1s
ă2z2ș
ă2z1t2
ă2z1ț
ă2z2v
ă2z1w
ă2z1x
ă2z1z
â2b1b
â2b1c
â2b1d
â2b1f4
â2b1g2
â2b1h
â2b1j
â2b1k
â2b1m
â2b1n
â2b1p2
â2b1q
â2b1s
â2b2ș
â2b1t2
â2b1ț
â2b1v
â2b1w
â2b1x
â2b1z
â2c1b
â2c1c
â2c1d
â2c1f4
â2c1g2
â2c1j
â2c1k
â2c1m
â2c5n
â2c1p2
â2c1q
â2c1s
â2c2ș
â2c1t2
â2c1ț
â2c1v
â2c1w
â2c1x
â2c1z
â2d1b
â2d1c
â2d1d
â2d1f4
â2d1g2
â2d1h
â2d1j
â2d1k
â2d1m
â2d1n
â2d1p2
â2d1q
â2d1s
â2d2ș
â2d1t2
â2d1ț
â2d1v
â2d1w
â2d1x
â2d1z
â2f1b
â2f1c
â2f1d
â2f4f4
â2f1g2
â2f1h
â2f1j
â2f1k
â2f1m
â2f1n
â2f1p2
â2f1q
â2f1s
â2f2ș
â2f1t2
â2f1ț
â2f1v
â2f1w
â2f1x
â2f1z
â2g1b
â2g1c
â2g1d
â2g1f4
â2g2g2
â2g1j
â2g1k
â2g3m
â2g3n
â2g1p2
â2g1q
â2g1s
â2g2ș
â2g1t2
â2g1ț
â2g3v
â2g1w
â2g1x
â2g1z
â2h1b
â2h1c
â2h1d
â2h1f4
â2h1g2
â2h1h
â2h1j
â2h1k
â2h1m
â2h1n
â2h1p2
â2h1q
â2h1s
â2h2ș
â2h1t2
â2h1ț
â2h1v
â2h1w
â2h1x
â2h1z
â2j1b
â2j1c
â2j1d
â2j1f4
â2j1g2
â2j1h
â2j1j
â2j1k
â2j1l
â2j1m
â2j1n
â2j1p2
â2j1q
â2j1r
â2j1s
â2j2ș
â2j1t2
â2j1ț
â2j1v
â2j1w
â2j1x
â2j1z
â2k1b
â2k1c
â2k1d
â2k1f4
â2k1g2
â2k1h
â2k1j
â2k1k
â2k1l
â2k1m
â2k1n
â2k1p2
â2k1q
â2k1r
â2k1s
â2k2ș
â2k1t2
â2k1ț
â2k1v
â2k1w
â2k1x
â2k1z
â2l1b
â2l1c
â2l1d
â2l1f4
â2l1g2
â2l1h
â2l1j
â2l1k
â2l1l
â2l1m
â2l5n
â2l1p2
â2l1q
â2l1r
â2l1s
â2l3ș
â2l1t2
â2l1ț
â2l1v
â2l1w
â2l1x
â2l1z
â2m1b
â2m1c
â2m1d
â2m1f4
â2m1g2
â2m1h
â2m1j
â2m1k
â2m1l
â2m1m
â2m1n
â2m1p2
â2m1q
â2m1r
â2m3s2
â2m2ș
â2m1t2
â2m1ț
â2m1v
â2m1w
â2m1x
â2m1z
â2n1b
â2n1c
â2n1d
â2n1f4
â2n1g2
â2n1h
â2n3j
â2n1k
â2n1l
â2n1m
â2n1n
â2n1p2
â2n1q
â2n1r
â2n3s2
â2n3ș2
â2n1t2
â2n1ț
â2n1v
â2n1w
â2n1x
â2n1z
â2p1b
â2p3c
â2p1d
â2p1f4
â2p1g2
â2p1h
â2p1j
â2p1k
â2p1m
â2p1n
â2p2p2
â2p1q
â2p3s
â2p3ș
â2p3t2
â2p3ț
â2p1v
â2p1w
â2p1x
â2p1z
â2q1b
â2q1c
â2q1d
â2q1f4
â2q1g2
â2q1h
â2q1j
â2q1k
â2q1l
â2q1m
â2q1n
â2q1p2
â2q1q
â2q1r
â2q1s
â2q2ș
â2q1t2
â2q1ț
â2q1v
â2q1w
â2q1x
â2q1z
â2r1b
â2r1c
â2r1d
â2r1f4
â2r1g2
â2r1h
â2r1j
â2r1k
â2r1l
â2r1m
â2r1n
â2r1p2
â2r1q
â2r1r
â2r1s2
â2r3ș
â2r1t2
â2r1ț
â2r1v
â2r1w
â2r1x
â2r1z
â2s1b
â2s1c
â2s1d
â4s2f4
â2s1g2
â2s1h
â2s1j
â2s1k
â3s4l
â4s1m
â2s1n
â2s1p2
â2s1q
â2s1r
â2s1s
â2s2ș
â2s1t2
â2s1ț
â2s1v
â2s1w
â2s1x
â2s1z
â2ș1b
â2ș1c
â2ș1d
â2ș1f4
â2ș1g2
â2ș1h
â2ș1j
â2ș1k
â2ș1l
â2ș1m
â4ș5n
â2ș2p2
â2ș1q
â2ș1r
â2ș1s
â2ș2ș
â2ș1t2
â2ș1ț
â2ș1v
â2ș1w
â2ș1x
â2ș1z
â2t1b
â2t3c
â2t3d
â2t3f4
â2t1g2
â2t1h
â2t1j
â2t1k
â2t3m
â2t1n
â2t1p2
â2t1q
â4t3s2
â2t2ș
â2t3t2
â2t1ț
â2t1v
â2t1w
â2t1x
â4t3z
â2ț1b
â2ț1c
â2ț1d
â2ț1f4
â2ț1g2
â2ț1h
â2ț1j
â2ț1k
â2ț1l
â2ț1m
â2ț1n
â2ț1p2
â2ț1q
â2ț1r
â2ț1s
â2ț2ș
â2ț1t2
â2ț1ț
â2ț1v
â2ț1w
â2ț1x
â2ț1z
â2v1b
â2v1c
â2v1d
â2v1f4
â2v1g2
â2v1h
â2v1j
â2v1k
â2v1m
â2v1n
â2v1p2
â2v1q
â2v1s
â2v2ș
â2v1t2
â2v1ț
â2v1v
â2v1w
â2v1x
â2v1z
â2w1b
â2w1c
â2w1d
â2w1f4
â2w1g2
â2w1h
â2w1j
â2w1k
â2w1l
â2w1m
â2w1n
â2w1p2
â2w1q
â2w1r
â2w1s
â2w2ș
â2w1t2
â2w1ț
â2w1v
â2w1w
â2w1x
â2w1z
â2x1b
â2x1c
â2x1d
â2x1f4
â2x1g2
â2x1h
â2x1j
â2x1k
â2x1l
â2x1m
â2x1n
â2x1p2
â2x1q
â2x1r
â2x1s
â2x2ș
â2x1t2
â2x1ț
â2x1v
â2x1w
â2x1x
â2x1z
â2z1b
â2z1c
â2z1d
â2z1f4
â2z2g2
â2z1h
â2z1j
â2z1k
â2z1l
â2z4m
â2z1n
â2z1p2
â2z1q
â2z1r
â2z1s
â2z2ș
â2z1t2
â2z1ț
â2z2v
â2z1w
â2z1x
â2z1z
e2b1b
e2b1c
e2b1d
e2b1f4
e2b1g2
e2b1h
e2b1j
e2b1k
e2b1m
e2b1n
e2b1p2
e2b1q
e2b1s
e2b2ș
e2b1t2
e2b1ț
e2b1v
e2b1w
e2b1x
e2b1z
e2c1b
e2c1c
e2c1d
e2c1f4
e2c1g2
e2c1j
e2c1k
e2c1m
e2c5n
e2c1p2
e2c1q
e2c1s
e2c2ș
e2c1t2
e2c1ț
e2c1v
e2c1w
e2c1x
e2c1z
e2d1b
e2d1c
e2d1d
e2d1f4
e2d1g2
e2d1h
e2d1j
e2d1k
e2d1m
e2d1n
e2d1p2
e2d1q
e2d1s
e2d2ș
e2d1t2
e2d1ț
e2d1v
e2d1w
e2d1x
e2d1z
e2f1b
e2f1c
e2f1d
e2f4f4
e2f1g2
e2f1h
e2f1j
e2f1k
e2f1m
e2f1n
e2f1p2
e2f1q
e2f1s
e2f2ș
e2f1t2
e2f1ț
e2f1v
e2f1w
e2f1x
e2f1z
e2g1b
e2g1c
e2g1d
e2g1f4
e2g2g2
e2g1j
e2g1k
e2g3m
e2g3n
e2g1p2
e2g1q
e2g1s
e2g2ș
e2g1t2
e2g1ț
e2g3v
e2g1w
e2g1x
e2g1z
e2h1b
e2h1c
e2h1d
e2h1f4
e2h1g2
e2h1h
e2h1j
e2h1k
e2h1m
e2h1n
e2h1p2
e2h1q
e2h1s
e2h2ș
e2h1t2
e2h1ț
e2h1v
e2h1w
e2h1x
e2h1z
e2j1b
e2j1c
e2j1d
e2j1f4
e2j1g2
e2j1h
e2j1j
e2j1k
e2j1l
e2j1m
e2j1n
e2j1p2
e2j1q
e2j1r
e2j1s
e2j2ș
e2j1t2
e2j1ț
e2j1v
e2j1w
e2j1x
e2j1z
e2k1b
e2k1c
e2k1d
e2k1f4
e2k1g2
e2k1h
e2k1j
e2k1k
e2k1l
e2k1m
e2k1n
e2k1p2
e2k1q
e2k1r
e2k1s
e2k2ș
e2k1t2
e2k1ț
e2k1v
e2k1w
e2k1x
e2k1z
e2l1b
e2l1c
e2l1d
e2l1f4
e2l1g2
e2l1h
e2l1j
e2l1k
e2l1l
e2l1m
e2l5n
e2l1p2
e2l1q
e2l1r
e2l1s
e2l3ș
e2l1t2
e2l1ț
e2l1v
e2l1w
e2l1x
e2l1z
e2m1b
e2m1c
e2m1d
e2m1f4
e2m1g2
e2m1h
e2m1j
e2m1k
e2m1l
e2m1m
e2m1n
e2m1p2
e2m1q
e2m1r
e2m3s2
e2m2ș
e2m1t2
e2m1ț
e2m1v
e2m1w
e2m1x
e2m1z
e2n1b
e2n1c
e2n1d
e2n1f4
e2n1g2
e2n1h
e2n3j
e2n1k
e2n1l
e2n1m
e2n1n
e2n1p2
e2n1q
e2n1r
e2n3s2
e2n3ș2
e2n1t2
e2n1ț
e2n1v
e2n1w
e2n1x
e2n1z
e2p1b
e2p3c
e2p1d
e2p1f4
e2p1g2
e2p1h
e2p1j
e2p1k
e2p1m
e2p1n
e2p2p2
e2p1q
e2p3s
e2p3ș
e2p3t2
e2p3ț
e2p1v
e2p1w
e2p1x
e2p1z
e2q1b
e2q1c
e2q1d
e2q1f4
e2q1g2
e2q1h
e2q1j
e2q1k
e2q1l
e2q1m
e2q1n
